Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.999, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fines; disbursement. (a) A person who commits an administrative violation under subdivision 1 must pay a fine of $60. (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c), two-thirds of a fine collected under this section must be credited to the general deleted text begin revenuedeleted text end fund of the local unit of government that employs the peace officer who issued the citation and one-third must be transferred to the commissioner of management and budget to be deposited in the deleted text begin state general funddeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . A local unit of government receiving fine proceeds under this section must use at least one-half of the funds for law enforcement purposes. The funds must be used to supplement but not supplant any existing law enforcement funding. (c) For fines collected under this section from administrative citations issued by state patrol troopers, one-third must be credited to the general fund of the local unit of government or entity that collects the fine and provides a hearing officer and two-thirds must be transferred to the commissioner of management and budget to be deposited in the deleted text begin state general funddeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Traffic fines and forfeited bail money. (a) All fines and forfeited bail money collected from persons apprehended or arrested by officers of the State Patrol deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be transmitted by the person or officer collecting the fines, forfeited bail money, or installments thereof, on or before the tenth day after the last day of the month in which deleted text begin these moneys were collecteddeleted text end new text begin the collections were madenew text end , to the commissioner of management and budget. Except where a different disposition is required in this subdivision or section 387.213, or otherwise provided by law, three-eighths of these receipts must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the deleted text begin state general funddeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . The other five-eighths of these receipts must be deposited in the state treasury and credited as follows: (1) the first $1,000,000 in each fiscal year must be credited to the Minnesota grade crossing safety account in the special revenue fund, and (2) remaining receipts must be credited to the deleted text begin statedeleted text end trunk highway fund. If, however, the violation occurs within a municipality and the city attorney prosecutes the offense, and a plea of not guilty is entered, one-third of the receipts deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the deleted text begin state general funddeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end , one-third deleted text begin of the receipts shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be paid to the municipality prosecuting the offense, and one-third deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Minnesota grade crossing safety account or the deleted text begin statedeleted text end trunk highway fund as provided in this paragraph. When section 387.213 also is applicable to the fine, section 387.213 deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be applied before this paragraph is applied. All costs of participation in a nationwide police communication system chargeable to the state of Minnesota deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be paid from appropriations for that purpose. (b) All fines and forfeited bail money from violations of statutes governing the maximum weight of motor vehicles, collected from persons apprehended or arrested by employees of the state of Minnesota, by means of stationary or portable scales operated by these employees, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be transmitted by the person or officer collecting the fines or forfeited bail money, on or before the tenth day after the last day of the month in which the collections were made, to the commissioner of management and budget. deleted text begin Five-eighths ofdeleted text end These receipts deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state highway user tax distribution fund. deleted text begin Three-eighths of these receipts shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state general fund.deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 357.021, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Disbursement of surcharges by commissioner of management and budget. (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) to (d), the commissioner of management and budget deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end disburse deleted text begin surchargesdeleted text end new text begin each surchargenew text end received under subdivision 6 as follows: (1) deleted text begin one percent shalldeleted text end new text begin 25 cents mustnew text end be credited to the peace officer training account in the game and fish fund to provide peace officer training for employees of the Department of Natural Resources who are licensed under sections 626.84 to 626.863deleted text begin ,deleted text end and who possess peace officer authority for the purpose of enforcing game and fish laws; and (2) deleted text begin 99 percent shall be credited to the general funddeleted text end new text begin $74.75 must be credited to (i) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (ii) the general fund, for all other offensesnew text end . (b) The commissioner of management and budget deleted text begin shall credit $3 of each surcharge received under subdivision 6deleted text end new text begin must credit the $12 parking surchargenew text end to the general fund. (c) deleted text begin In addition to any amounts credited under paragraph (a), the commissioner of management and budget shall credit the following to the general fund: $47 of each surcharge received under subdivision 6; the $12 parking surcharge; anddeleted text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must creditnew text end the $25 surcharge for a violation of section 609.855, subdivision 1, 3, or 3anew text begin , to the general fundnew text end . (d) If the Ramsey County Board of Commissioners authorizes imposition of the additional $1 surcharge provided for in subdivision 6, paragraph (a), the court administrator in the Second Judicial District deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end transmit the surcharge to the commissioner of management and budget. The $1 special surcharge is deposited in a Ramsey County surcharge account in the special revenue fund and amounts in the account are appropriated to the trial courts for the administration of the petty misdemeanor diversion program operated by the Second Judicial District Ramsey County Violations Bureau. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.841, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disposition of fines, fees, and other money; accounts. (a) Except as otherwise provided within this subdivision, and except as otherwise provided by law, the court administrator deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end pay all fines and penalties collected by the court administrator, all fees collected by the court administrator for court administrator's services, all sums forfeited to the court as provided in this subdivision, and all other money received by the court administrator to the subdivision of government entitled to it as follows on or before the 20th day after the last day of the month in which the money was collected. Eighty percent of all fines and penalties collected during the previous month deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be paid to the treasurer of the municipality or subdivision of government where the crime was committed. The remainder of the fines and penalties deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be credited to new text begin (1) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (2) new text end the general fund deleted text begin of the statedeleted text end new text begin , for all other offensesnew text end . In all cases in which the county attorney had charge of the prosecution, all fines and penalties deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be credited to new text begin (1) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (2) new text end the deleted text begin statedeleted text end general fundnew text begin , for all other offensesnew text end . (b) The court administrator deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end identify the name of the municipality or other subdivision of government where the offense was committed and the total amount of fines or penalties collected for each municipality or other subdivision of government, for the county, or for the state. (c) Amounts represented by checks issued by the court administrator or received by the court administrator which have not cleared by the end of the month may be shown on the monthly account as having been paid or received, subject to adjustment on later monthly accounts. (d) The court administrator may receive negotiable instruments in payment of fines, penalties, fees or other obligations as conditional paymentsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and is not held accountable for this until collection in cash is made and then only to the extent of the net collection after deduction of the necessary expense of collection. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.85, is amended to read: 484.85 DISPOSITION OF FINES, FEES, AND OTHER MONEY; ACCOUNTS; RAMSEY COUNTY DISTRICT COURT. (a) In all cases prosecuted in Ramsey County District Court by an attorney for a municipality or subdivision of government within Ramsey County for violation of a statute; an ordinance; or a charter provision, rule, or regulation of a citydeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end all fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected by the court administrator deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the state treasury and distributed according to this paragraph. Except where a different disposition is provided by section 299D.03, subdivision 5, or other law, on or before the last day of each month, the court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end pay over all fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected by the court administrator during the previous month as follows: two-thirds paid to the treasurer of the municipality or subdivision of government within Ramsey County and one-third credited to new text begin (1) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (2) new text end the deleted text begin statedeleted text end general fundnew text begin , for all other offensesnew text end . All other fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected by the district court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be distributed by the courts as provided by law. (b) Fines, penalties, and forfeitures deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be distributed as provided in paragraph (a) when: (1) a city contracts with the county attorney for prosecutorial services under section 484.87, subdivision 3; or (2) the attorney general provides assistance to the city attorney under section 484.87, subdivision 5. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.90, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Allocation. (a) In all cases prosecuted in district court by an attorney for a municipality or other subdivision of government within the county for violations of state statutedeleted text begin ,deleted text end or of an ordinancedeleted text begin ;deleted text end or charter provision, rule, or regulation of a citydeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end all fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deposited in the state treasury and distributed according to this paragraph. For the purpose of this section, the county attorney deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be considered the attorney for any town in which a violation occurs. Except where a different disposition is provided by section 299D.03, subdivision 5, 484.841, 484.85, or other law, on or before the last day of each month, the courts deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end pay over all fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected by the court administrator during the previous month as follows: (1) 100 percent of all fines or penalties for parking violations for which complaints and warrants have not been issued to the treasurer of the city or town in which the offense was committed; and (2) two-thirds of all other fines to the treasurer of the city or town in which the offense was committed and one-third credited to new text begin (1) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (2) new text end the deleted text begin statedeleted text end general fundnew text begin , for all other offensesnew text end . All other fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected by the court administrator deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be distributed by the courts as provided by law. (b) Fines, penalties, and forfeitures deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be distributed as provided in paragraph (a) when: (1) a city contracts with the county attorney for prosecutorial services under section 484.87, subdivision 3; (2) a city has a population of 600 or less and has given the duty to prosecute cases to the county attorney under section 484.87; or (3) the attorney general provides assistance to the county attorney as permitted by law. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 574.34, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General. Fines and forfeitures not specially granted or appropriated by law deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be paid into the treasury of the county where they are incurred, except in a county in a judicial district under section 480.181, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), the fines and forfeitures must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to new text begin (1) the highway user tax distribution fund, for traffic offenses, or (2) new text end the general fundnew text begin , for all other offensesnew text end .